tables/en-us-g3.ctb
# the letter m
always maha =
word made 456-23456
endword made 134-245
word make 5-23456
endword make 134-13-15
word makes 134-13-1356
endword makes 134-13-1356
word making 134-13-1245
endword making 134-13-1245
always many 456-134
word may 4-134
begword mccon 134-14-25
begword mc =
word me 345
word mean 45-345
begword mean 45-345
always medic 134-1246-24-14 medicare
always member 134-134
midendword ment 56-2345
midword menth 134-26-1456 Blumenthal
always mideast 134-24-145-15-1-34
word might 4-345
begword mighti 4-345-24
word mighty 134-126-56
endword mighty 134-126-56
word milling 134-24-123-123-346
always mind 5-345
always minestrone 134-35-15-34-1235-135-1345-15
always mishap =
sufword mishear 134-24-234-125-15-345 misheard
begword missh 134-24-234-146 misshapen
begword misst 134-24-234-34 missstep
word mistook 134-24-234-2345-13
begword mistran = mistranslation
sufword mistreat 134-24-234-2345-1235-2-2345
begword mistru = mistrust
begword misty = mistyped
word monetary 134-5-135-2345-345-13456
always mongoose =
word more 134
word moreover 134-135
word most 45-134
begword most 45-134
endword most 45-134
always mother 5-134
always much 134-16
word must 134-34
word mustn 134-34-1345
word musty 134-34-13456
word my 456-345
begword myo = myofibroblasts
word myself 134-13456-124
contraction myf

# the letter n
always name 5-1345
always naming 5-1345-1245
midendword nament 1345-1-56-2345 tournament
always namese =
word near 45-1345
begword near 45-1345
word near-by 45-1345-36-12-13456
word necessarily 1345-15-14-45
endword necessarily 1345-15-14-45
prfword necessary 1345-15-14 unnecessary
contraction nec
word neither 1345-15-24
contraction nei
midendword ness 56-234
word never 456-1345
word nevertheless 456-1345-46
word new 1345-2456
word newer 1345-2456-12456
word newest 1345-2456-15-34
word newly 1345-2456-45
word renew 246-1345-2456
word renewal 246-1345-2456-1-123
word renewals 246-1345-2456-1-123-234
word renewed 246-1345-2456-1246
word renewing 246-1345-2456-346
always news = newsstand
word next 4-1345
syllable nomad = seminomadic
word no 3456
word nobody 45-3456
always nodded 1345-135-256-1246 for back-translation
word none 5-3456
begword nonen 1345-135-1345-26 nonentity
begword noness = nonessential
word nonetheless 1345-5-135-2346-46-234
always noneq =
always nonex =
begword nong = nongraphical
word nor 1345-1235
word noone 1345-135-5-135
word north 1345-1235-1456
begword north 1345-1235-1456
word northeast 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34
word northeastward 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-2456
word northern 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345
endword north 1345-1235-1456
begword nose = nosedive
word nosed 1345-135-234-1246
word not 1345
word note 1345-2345-15
begword note 1345-2345-15
endword note 1345-2345-15
word noted 1345-2345-145
endword noted 1345-2345-145
word notes 1345-2345-1356
endword notes 1345-2345-1356
word noting 1345-2345-1245
endword noting 1345-2345-1245
word nothing 456-3456
word nothings 456-3456-234
word notwithstanding 1345-346
word now 246
word noways =
word nowhere 1345-135-5-156
word number 4-3456
begword number 4-3456

# the letter o
word O 135
midword oa 45
midword oar 135-345
midword oe 45
midword oed 135-1246
midword oen 135-26
midword oer 135-12456
midword oed = Schroeder
always oen = Phoenix
midendword oence 135-26-14-15 electroencephalogram
largesign of 12356
midendword ofar 135-124-345 insofar
midendword ofa 12356-1 back-translation: sofa
word offer 4-12356
begword offer 4-12356
word office 45-12356
begword office 45-12356
word official 456-12356
begword official 456-12356
midword ofor 135-123456
word often 5-12356
begword often 5-12356
midword oi 45
midword oin 135-35
midword oing 135-346
always old 4-135
word on 135
word once 135-36
midendword onea = Hasmonean
always onesi =
midendword oness 135-56-234
midendword oneer 135-1345-15-12456
midendword oned 135-1345-1246
always one 5-135
always oning 5-135-1245
always oneal = peritoneal
midendword oneless 5-135-46-234 tonelessly
midendword onel = salmonella colonel
always onem = phoneme
midendword onement 5-135-56-2345 atonement
midendword onent 135-1345-26-2345
midendword oneous 135-1345-15-1256-234 erroneous
always oner 135-1345-12456
midendword onese = Cantonese,
word oneself 5-135-124
midendword oness 135-56-234 Deaconess
midendword onet = phonetics bayonet
endword onez = Ordonez
midendword ong 56-1245
word only 135-45
midword oo 45
always oon = sooner
word or 346
word order 5-346
begword order 5-346
word ordinarily 456-346
endword ordinarily 456-346
word ordinary 45-346
endword ordinary 45-346
word origin 4-346
begword origin 4-346
always osome =
endword ote 356
word other 45-135
begword other 45-135
word ou =
always ou 1256
always ounce 45-1256
always ouncing 45-1256-1245
midendword ound 46-145
midendword ount 46-2345
word our 456-1256
word ours 456-1256-234
always ourselves 1256-1235-1236-234
endword ous 1256
endword ously 1256-45
endword ousness 1256-56-234
endword ousnesses 1256-56-234-1356
word out 1256
begword out 1256
begword outcom 1256-36
begword outdis 1256-256
begword outre 1256-246
word outside 4-1256
always ought 5-1256
word over 456-135
begword over 456-135
endword over 456-135
always ow 246
word own 4-246
begword own 4-246
word o'clock 135-3-14
midword oy 45

# the letter p
prfword paid 1234-145
contraction pd
always part 5-1234
begword parta 1234-345-2345-1 partake
begword parthe 1234-345-2346 parthenon
begword parth 1234-345-1456 parthian
always particular 5-1234-1235
begword parto 1234-345-2345-135
begword parthen 1234-345-2346-1345 parthenon parthenogenesis
word people 1234
always perceive 1234-12456-14-1236
always perceiving 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
always perhaps 1234-12456-125
begword photo =
always pher 1234-125-12456 cyphered
always pineapple 1234-35-15-1-1234-1234-123-15
word please 45-1234
begword please 45-1234
word pleasing 45-1234-1245
begword pleasing 45-1234-1245
syllable portion 1234-135-1235-56-1345
syllable port = porthole
always possible 1234-3456
word possibly 1234-46-13456
endword possibly 1234-46-13456
begword potho = pothole pothook
midword pp 36
begword pre 4-1234
word precious 1234-1235-15-14-24-1256
begword pressur 1234-1235-15-46-136-1235
word press 1234-1235-15-46
begword press 1234-1235-15-46
word presto 1234-1235-15-34-135
word prey 1234-1235-15-13456
begword prey 1234-1235-5
word preen 1234-1235-15-26
begword preen 1234-1235-15-26
word preach 1234-1235-2-16
begword preach 1234-1235-2-16
word pretzel 1234-1235-15-2345-1356-15-123
begword pretzel 1234-1235-15-2345-1356-15-123
begword prepp 1234-1235-15-36
begword prett 1234-1235-15-356
sufword predator 1234-1235-1246-1-2345-135-1235
word present 4-1234-234
begword present 4-1234-234
word prevent 4-1234-1236
begword prevent 4-1234-1236
begword pro 456-1234
begword proc 456-1234-14
begword prod 456-1234-145
begword prof 456-1234-124
begword prog 456-1234-1245
begword prom 456-1234-134
begword prop 456-1234-1234
begword pros 456-1234-234
begword prot 456-1234-2345
begword prov 456-1234-1236
word problem 1234-1235-135-12-123-15-134
begword problem 1234-1235-135-12-123-15-134
always prone 1234-1235-5-135
word profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345
begword profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345
word proper 1234-1235-135-1234-12456
begword proper 1234-1235-135-1234-12456
word prophet 1234-1235-135-1234-125-15-2345
begword prophet 1234-1235-135-1234-125-15-2345
word proof 1234-1235-135-12356
begword proof 1234-1235-135-12356
always probable 456-1234-3456
word probably 456-1234-46-13456
endword probably 456-1234-46-13456
always prof =
word prof. 1234-1235-12356-256
begword proff 1234-1235-12356-124 proffer
always profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345
always put 1234-2345
always putting 1234-356-346

# the letter q
begmidword qu 12345

word quality 456-12345
word quick 45-12345
begword quick 45-12345
midendword quick 12345-13
contraction qk
always quiet 4-12345
word quite 12345
always question 5-12345

# the letter r
sufword rafter 1235-1-124-2345-12456
word rather 1235
sufword raw = rawhide
begword reab = reabsorbed
always reac =
always reach 1235-2-16
word read 45-1235
begword read 45-1235
begword readj = readjust
begword readm = readmit
begword reaff 1235-15-1-235
sufword reagent 1235-15-1-1245-26-2345
begword reagg 1235-15-1-2356 reaggregated
begword realig = realign
begword rean = reanalyze, reanimate
begword reapp = reappear
begword reass 1235-15-1-234-234
begword reatt = reattach
begword reau = reauthorization
begword reaw = reawaken
begword rede =
begword redi =
word redo =
word redone 1235-15-145-5-135
begword redou 1235-15-145-1256 redouble redoubt 
always redu =
always receive 1235-14-1236
contraction rcv
contraction rcvd
contraction rcvr
contraction rcvs
always receiving 1235-14-1236-1245
contraction rcvg
begword redis = redistribute
begword redr = redress
word re 1235-15
begword re 246
begword rebe 246-23
begword recom 246-36
begword recon 246-25
begword rede 246-245
begword redis 246-256
begword reout 246-1256
begword reun 246-346
word redo 246-145-135
begword redo 246-145-135
word redid 246-145-24-145
word redone 246-145-5-135
word renumber 246-1345-136-134-12-12456
begword renumber 246-1345-136-134-12-12456
begword rerou 246-1235-1256
word redu 246-145-136
word reapp 246-1-36
word recount 246-14-46-2345
begword recount 246-14-46-2345
word remake 246-134-13-15
begword remake 246-134-13-15
word renew 246-1345-2456
begword renew 246-1345-2456
word return 246-2345-1235-1345
begword return 246-2345-1235-1345
word reopen 246-135-1234-26
begword reopen 246-135-1234-26
begword rebuil 246-12-56-123
word revamp 246-1236-1-134-1234
begword revamp 246-1236-1-134-1234
begword rewr 246-2456-1235
word rerecord 246-1235-15-14-135-1235-145
begword rerecord 246-1235-15-14-135-1235-145
word red 1235-1246
begword red 1235-1246
word real 1235-2-123
begword real 1235-2-123
endword real 1235-2-123
word really 1235-15-6-13456
word regular 456-1235
begword regular 456-1235
endword regular 456-1235
word reichstag 1235-15-24-16-234-2345-1-1245
always rejoice 1235-245-14
contraction rjc
contraction rjcd
contraction rjcr
contraction rjcs
always rejoicing 1235-245-14-1245
contraction rjcg
sufword renaming 1235-15-1345-1-134-346 renamings
begword rene =
begword renom = renominate
begword renou 1235-15-1345-1256 renounce
sufword renown 1235-15-1345-246-1345 renowned
begword renu = renunciation
word represent 4-1235
begword represent 4-1235
endword represent 4-1235
begword rera = reradiate
sufword reread 1235-15-1235-2-145
sufword rerun = reruns
always rever 1235-15-1236-12456
always reveren 1235-5-15-26 irreverent
always reverence 1235-5-15-56-15 irreverence
sufword reverie 1235-5-15-24-15
begword ribof =
begword ribon =
always right 5-1235
midword rr 236
word rule 1235-12345
endword rule 1235-12345
word ruled 1235-123-145
endword ruled 1235-123-145
word ruling 1235-123-1245
endword ruling 1235-123-1245
word rulingly 1235-123-1245-45
endword ruling 1235-123-1245-45
word ruler 1235-123-1235
endword ruler 1235-123-1235
word rulers 1235-123-1235-234
endword rulers 1235-123-1235-234
word rules 1235-123-1356
endword rules 1235-123-1356
endword ry 5
